District of Columbia statutes.
2-101

Citation of subchapter.

This subchapter may be cited as the “Boiler Inspection Act of the District of Columbia.”

June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1917, ch. 802, § 1
1981 Ed., § 1-1001.
1973 Ed., § 1-701.